Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2110
Shares; par value; authorized capital.

(1) Each share of stock of the corporation shall have a par value of not less than ten dollars per share, as fixed by its articles of incorporation, and shall be issued only for lawful money of the United States. At least two hundred thousand dollars shall be paid into the treasury for capital stock before a corporation shall be authorized to transact any business other than such business as relates to its organization.

(2) Each shareholder shall be entitled to one vote, in person or by proxy, for each share of capital stock held, and each member shall be entitled to one vote, in person or by proxy, as such member.

(3) The rights given by the Business Corporation Act to shareholders to attend meetings and to receive notice thereof and to exercise voting rights shall apply to members as well as to shareholders of a corporation created under the Nebraska Business Development Corporation Act. The voting rights of the members shall be the same as if they were a separate class of shareholders, and shareholders and members shall in all cases vote separately by classes. A quorum at a shareholders' meeting shall require the presence in person or by proxy of a majority of the holders of the voting rights of each class.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 10, p. 306;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 206.

Business Corporation Act, see section 21-2001.